en: White chocolates with hazelnuts
bg: Бял шоколад с лешници, Бели шоколади с лешници
de: Weiße Schokoladen mit Haselnüssen
fr: Chocolats blancs aux noisettes
hr: Bijele čokolade s lješnjacima
lt: Balti šokoladai su lazdyno riešutais
nl: Witte chocola met hazelnoten

en: White chocolates with rice crisps
nl: Witte chocoladen met ricecrisps

en: White chocolates with almonds
bg: Бял шоколад с бадеми
fr: Chocolats blancs aux amandes
hr: Bijele čokolade s bademima
lt: Balti šokoladai su migdolais

en: Filled white chocolates
de: Gefüllte weiße Schokoladen
fr: Chocolats blancs fourrés
hr: Punjene bijele čokolade
lt: Balti šokoladai su įdaru
nl: Gevulde witte chocola

en: White chocolate bar with dried fruits
fr: Chocolat blanc en tablette aux fruits secs

fr: Chocolat blanc en tablette aux noisettes
en: White chocolate bar with nuts
hr: Bijela čokolada s orasima
lt: Baltos šokolado plytelės su riešutais

fr: Chocolat blanc en tablette aux amandes
en: White chocolate bar with almonds

fr: Chocolat blanc en tablette aux raisins
en: White chocolate bar with raisins
hr: Bijela čokolada s grožđicama
lt: Balti šokoladai su razinomis

en: White chocolate bar with praline
de: Weiße Schokolade mit Praliné
es: Tableta de chocolate blanco con praliné
fr: Chocolat blanc en tablette aux praliné
hr: Bijela čokolada s pralinama
it: Tavoletta di cioccolato bianco con praliné
lt: Baltas šokolado batonėlis su praline
nl: Witte chocoladereep met praliné

en: Easter chocolate rabbits, Chocolate rabbits, Easter rabbits
de: Schokoladenhasen
es: Conejos De Chocolate, Conejos De Pascua
fi: suklaapuput
fr: Lapins en chocolat, lapin en chocolat, lapins de pâques, lapin de pâques
hr: Čokoladni zečevi
hu: Csokoládé nyulak, húsvéti nyulak
it: Conigli di cioccolato, Coniglietti di cioccolato, Conigli pasquali di cioccolato, Coniglietti pasquali di cioccolato
ja: うさぎ型のチョコレート
lt: Šokoladiniai kiškiai, Šokoladiniai zuikiai, Vėlykiniai kiškiai
nl: Chocolade paashazen

en: Chocolates with sweeteners
bg: Шоколад с подсладители
de: Schokoladen mit Süßungsmitteln
es: Chocolates con edulcorantes
fi: Suklaat makeutusaineilla
fr: Chocolats édulcorés, Chocolats aux édulcorants, chocolats diététiques
hr: Čokolade sa zaslađivačima
it: Cioccolato con edulcorante
lt: Šokoladai su saldikliais
nl: Chocola met zoetstoffen

en: Flavoured chocolates
de: Aromatisierte Schokolade
fi: maustetut suklaat
fr: Chocolats aromatisés
hr: Čokolade s okusom
hu: Ízesített csokoládék
it: Cioccolato aromatizzato
lt: Aromatizuoti šokoladai
nl: Gearomatiseerde chocola

en: Flavoured dark chocolates
de: Aromatisierte dunkle Schokolade
fr: Chocolats noirs aromatisés
hr: Tamne čokolade s okusom
it: Cioccolati fondenti aromatizzati
lt: Aromatizuoti juodi šokoladai
nl: Pure chocolade met smaak

en: Flavoured milk chocolates
de: Aromatisierte Milchschokolade
fr: Chocolats au lait aromatisés
hr: Aromatizirane mliječne čokolade
lt: Aromatizuoti pieniški šokoladai

en: Flavoured white chocolates
de: Aromatisierte weiße Schokolade
fr: Chocolats blancs aromatisés
hr: Aromatizirane bijele čokolade
lt: Aromatizuoti balti šokoladai

en: Filled chocolates
de: Gefüllte Schokolade, Schokolade mit Füllung
es: Chocolate relleno, Chocolates rellenos
fi: täytesuklaat
fr: Chocolats fourrés
hr: Punjene čokolade
hu: Töltött csokoládék
it: Cioccolato ripieno
lt: Šokoladai su įdaru
nl: Gevulde chocola

en: Chocolate filled with praline, Chocolates stuffed with praline
de: Schokolade mit Praliné-Füllung
fi: praliineilla täytetyt suklaat
fr: Chocolats fourrés au praliné, chocolat fourré au praliné
hr: Čokolada punjena pralinama
nl: Chocolades gevuld met praliné

en: Filled dark chocolates
de: Gefüllte dunkle Schokolade, Dunkle Schokolade mit Füllung
fi: täytetyt tummat suklaat
fr: Chocolats noirs fourrés
hr: Punjene tamne čokolade
it: Cioccolato fondente ripieno
lt: Juodi šokoladai su įdaru
nl: Gevulde pure chocola

en: Filled milk chocolates
de: Gefüllte Milchschokolade, Milchschokolade mit Füllung
fi: täytetyt maitosuklaat
fr: Chocolats au lait fourrés, Chocolat au lait fourré
hr: Punjene mliječne čokolade
it: Cioccolatini ripieni di latte
lt: Pieniški šokoladai su įdaru
nl: Gevulde melkchocolade

en: Milk chocolate filled with praline, Milk chocolate bar filled with praline
fr: Chocolats au lait fourré au praliné, chocolats au lait en tablette fourré au praliné, Tablettes de chocolat au lait fourré au praliné